Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1805
Award of fees and expenses against state; additional to compensation.

Fees and expenses awarded pursuant to sections 25-1802 to 25-1807 may be ordered in addition to any compensation awarded in a judgment.

Laws 1982, LB 192, § 4.